Maryland, session 2026, HB1282.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF MARYLAND,
That the Laws of Maryland read as follows:
Article – Business Regulation
16–3A–01.
(a) In this subtitle the following words have the meanings indicated.
(c) (1) “Tobacco product” means any product that is:
(i) intended for human inhalation, absorption, ingestion, smoking,
heating, chewing, dissolving, or any other manner of consumption that is made of, derived
from, or contains:
1. tobacco; or
2. nicotine; or
(ii) an accessory or a component used in any manner of consumption
of a product described in item (i) of this paragraph.
(2) “Tobacco product” includes:
(i) cigarettes, cigars, pipe tobacco, chewing tobacco, snuff, and snus;
(ii) electronic smoking devices; and
(iii) filters, rolling papers, pipes, and liquids used in electronic
smoking devices regardless of nicotine content.
(3) “Tobacco product” does not include a drug, device, or combination
product authorized for sale by the U.S. Food and Drug Administration under the Federal
Food, Drug, and Cosmetic Act.
16–3B–02.
(A) A PERSON LICENSED UNDER THIS TITLE MAY NOT DIRECTLY OR
INDIRECTLY ADVERTISE OR MARKET TOBACCO PRODUCTS TO INDIVIDUALS UNDER
THE AGE OF 21 YEARS.
(B) IT IS A VIOLATION OF SUBSECTION (A) OF THIS SECTION FOR A PERSON
LICENSED UNDER THIS TITLE TO USE ANY OF THE FOLLOWING IN THE ADVERTISING,
PROMOTION, PACKAGING, OR LABELING OF A TOBACCO PRODUCT:
(1) A CARTOON;

HOUSE BILL 1282 3
(2) A SUPERHERO;
(3) A VIDEO GAME REFERENCE;
(4) AN IMAGE OF A FOOD PRODUCT PRIMARILY INTENDED FOR
MINORS;
(5) A TRADEMARK THAT IMITATES OR MIMICS THE TRADEMARK OF A
PRODUCT THAT HAS BEEN ADVERTISED OR MARKETED PRIMARILY TO MINORS;
(6) A SYMBOL OR CELEBRITY THAT IS PRIMARILY ASSOCIATED WITH
MINORS OR MEDIA PRIMARILY DIRECTED TO INDIVIDUALS UNDER THE AGE OF 21
YEARS; AND
(7) AN IMAGE OF AN INDIVIDUAL WHO APPEARS TO BE UNDER THE
AGE OF 27 YEARS.
(C) IT IS A VIOLATION OF SUBSECTION (A) OF THIS SECTION FOR A PERSON
LICENSED UNDER THIS TITLE TO ADVERTISE OR PROMOTE A TOBACCO PRODUCT:
(1) IN A NEWSPAPER, MAGAZINE, PERIODICAL, OR OTHER
PUBLICATION FOR WHICH INDIVIDUALS UNDER THE AGE OF 21 YEARS CONSTITUTE
15% OR MORE OF THE TOTAL AUDIENCE, AS MEASURED BY COMPETENT AND
RELIABLE SURVEY EVIDENCE;
(2) AT A CONCERT, STADIUM, SPORTING EVENT, OR OTHER PUBLIC
EVENT FOR WHICH INDIVIDUALS UNDER THE AGE OF 21 YEARS CONSTITUTE 15% OR
MORE OF THE TOTAL AUDIENCE, AS MEASURED BY COMPETENT AND RELIABLE
SURVEY EVIDENCE; OR
(3) ON AN OUTDOOR BILLBOARD OR SIGN BOARD THAT IS WITHIN 500
FEET OF A SCHOOL.
16.5–101.
(a) In this title the following words have the meanings indicated.
(j) (1) “Other tobacco products” means, except as provided in paragraph (3) of
this subsection, a product that is:
(i) intended for human consumption or likely to be consumed,
whether smoked, heated, chewed, absorbed, dissolved, inhaled, or ingested in any other
manner, and that is made of or derived from, or that contains:

HOUSE BILL 1282
1. tobacco; or
2. nicotine; or
(ii) a component or part used in a consumable product described
under item (i) of this paragraph.
(2) “Other tobacco products” includes:
(i) cigars, premium cigars, pipe tobacco, chewing tobacco, snuff, and
snus; and
(ii) filters, rolling papers, pipes, and hookahs.
(3) “Other tobacco products” does not include:
(i) cigarettes;
(ii) electronic smoking devices;
(iii) drugs, devices, or combination products authorized for sale by
the U.S. Food and Drug Administration under the Federal Food, Drug, and Cosmetic Act;
or
(iv) tobacco pipes, as defined under § 11–104 of the Tax – General
Article.
16.5–217.2.
(A) A PERSON LICENSED UNDER THIS TITLE MAY NOT DIRECTLY OR
INDIRECTLY ADVERTISE OR MARKET OTHER TOBACCO PRODUCTS TO INDIVIDUALS
UNDER THE AGE OF 21 YEARS.
(B) IT IS A VIOLATION OF SUBSECTION (A) OF THIS SECTION FOR A PERSON
LICENSED UNDER THIS TITLE TO USE ANY OF THE FOLLOWING IN THE ADVERTISING,
PROMOTION, PACKAGING, OR LABELING OF OTHER TOBACCO PRODUCTS:
(1) A CARTOON;
(2) A SUPERHERO;
(3) A VIDEO GAME REFERENCE;

HOUSE BILL 1282 5
(4) AN IMAGE OF A FOOD PRODUCT PRIMARILY INTENDED FOR
MINORS;
(5) A TRADEMARK THAT IMITATES OR MIMICS THE TRADEMARK OF A
PRODUCT THAT HAS BEEN ADVERTISED OR MARKETED PRIMARILY TO MINORS;
(6) A SYMBOL OR CELEBRITY THAT IS PRIMARILY ASSOCIATED WITH
MINORS OR MEDIA PRIMARILY DIRECTED TO INDIVIDUALS UNDER THE AGE OF 21
YEARS; AND
(7) AN IMAGE OF AN INDIVIDUAL WHO APPEARS TO BE UNDER THE
AGE OF 27 YEARS.
(C) IT IS A VIOLATION OF SUBSECTION (A) OF THIS SECTION FOR A PERSON
LICENSED UNDER THIS TITLE TO ADVERTISE OR PROMOTE OTHER TOBACCO
PRODUCTS:
(1) IN A NEWSPAPER, MAGAZINE, PERIODICAL, OR OTHER
PUBLICATION FOR WHICH INDIVIDUALS UNDER THE AGE OF 21 YEARS CONSTITUTE
15% OR MORE OF THE TOTAL AUDIENCE, AS MEASURED BY COMPETENT AND
RELIABLE SURVEY EVIDENCE;
(2) AT A CONCERT, STADIUM, SPORTING EVENT, OR OTHER PUBLIC
EVENT FOR WHICH INDIVIDUALS UNDER THE AGE OF 21 YEARS CONSTITUTE 15% OR
MORE OF THE TOTAL AUDIENCE, AS MEASURED BY COMPETENT AND RELIABLE
SURVEY EVIDENCE; OR
(3) ON AN OUTDOOR BILLBOARD OR SIGN BOARD THAT IS WITHIN 500
FEET OF A SCHOOL.
16.7–101.
(a) In this title the following words have the meanings indicated.
(c) (1) “Electronic smoking device” means a device that can be used to deliver
aerosolized or vaporized nicotine to an individual inhaling from the device.
(2) “Electronic smoking device” includes:
(i) an electronic cigarette, an electronic cigar, an electronic cigarillo,
an electronic pipe, an electronic hookah, a vape pen, and vaping liquid; and
(ii) except as provided in paragraph (3) of this subsection, any
component, part, or accessory of such a device regardless of whether or not it is sold

HOUSE BILL 1282
separately, including any substance intended to be aerosolized or vaporized during use of
the device.
(3) “Electronic smoking device” does not include:
(i) a drug, device, or combination product authorized for sale by the
U.S. Food and Drug Administration under the Federal Food, Drug, and Cosmetic Act; or
(ii) a battery or battery charger when sold separately.
(l) “Vaping liquid” means a liquid that:
(1) consists of propylene glycol, vegetable glycerin, or other similar
substance;
(2) may or may not contain natural or artificial flavors;
(3) may or may not contain nicotine; and
(4) converts to vapor intended for inhalation when heated in an electronic
device.
16.7–213.4.
(A) A PERSON LICENSED UNDER THIS TITLE MAY NOT DIRECTLY OR
INDIRECTLY ADVERTISE OR MARKET ELECTRONIC SMOKING DEVICES OR VAPING
LIQUID TO INDIVIDUALS UNDER THE AGE OF 21 YEARS.
(B) IT IS A VIOLATION OF SUBSECTION (A) OF THIS SECTION FOR A PERSON
LICENSED UNDER THIS TITLE TO USE ANY OF THE FOLLOWING IN THE ADVERTISING,
PROMOTION, PACKAGING, OR LABELING OF AN ELECTRONIC SMOKING DEVICE:
(1) A CARTOON;
(2) A SUPERHERO;
(3) A VIDEO GAME REFERENCE;
(4) AN IMAGE OF A FOOD PRODUCT PRIMARILY INTENDED FOR
MINORS;
(5) A TRADEMARK THAT IMITATES OR MIMICS THE TRADEMARK OF A
PRODUCT THAT HAS BEEN ADVERTISED OR MARKETED PRIMARILY TO MINORS;

HOUSE BILL 1282 7
(6) A SYMBOL OR CELEBRITY THAT IS PRIMARILY ASSOCIATED WITH
MINORS OR MEDIA PRIMARILY DIRECTED TO INDIVIDUALS UNDER THE AGE OF 21
YEARS; AND
(7) AN IMAGE OF AN INDIVIDUAL WHO APPEARS TO BE UNDER THE
AGE OF 27 YEARS.
(C) IT IS A VIOLATION OF SUBSECTION (A) OF THIS SECTION FOR A PERSON
LICENSED UNDER THIS TITLE TO ADVERTISE OR PROMOTE AN ELECTRONIC
SMOKING DEVICE:
(1) IN A NEWSPAPER, MAGAZINE, PERIODICAL, OR OTHER
PUBLICATION FOR WHICH INDIVIDUALS UNDER THE AGE OF 21 YEARS CONSTITUTE
15% OR MORE OF THE TOTAL AUDIENCE, AS MEASURED BY COMPETENT AND
RELIABLE SURVEY EVIDENCE;
(2) AT A CONCERT, STADIUM, SPORTING EVENT, OR OTHER PUBLIC
EVENT FOR WHICH INDIVIDUALS UNDER THE AGE OF 21 YEARS CONSTITUTE 15% OR
MORE OF THE TOTAL AUDIENCE, AS MEASURED BY COMPETENT AND RELIABLE
SURVEY EVIDENCE; OR
(3) ON AN OUTDOOR BILLBOARD OR SIGN BOARD THAT IS WITHIN 500
FEET OF A SCHOOL.
[16.7–213.4.] 16.7–213.5.
The Executive Director may adopt regulations to implement this subtitle.
16.7–214.
Unless otherwise specified in this title, a person that violates any provision of this
title is guilty of a misdemeanor and on conviction is subject to a fine not exceeding $1,000
or imprisonment not exceeding 30 days or both.
SECTION 2. AND BE IT FURTHER ENACTED, That this Act shall take effect
October 1, 2026.